Missouri, session 2026, HB3445.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 210, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 210.204, to read as follows:
210.204. 1. As used in this section, "local educational agencies" mean school
districts and charter schools that have declared themselves as local educational agencies.
2. A licensed child care facility enrolling a child who requires a medical provider
statement of special needs for child care shall do the following if parental permission is
provided:
(1) Refer the child's family to local educational agencies or private education
agencies to support the needs of the child and the child's family;
(2) Collaborate with local educational agencies or private education agencies to
ensure the needs of the child are met;
(3) Coordinate with local educational agencies for a specialized care plan when
the child reaches three years of age;
(4) Prepare a specialized care plan to ensure best practices for the child are
followed; and
(5) Provide training to child care facility staff members to support of the needs
of the child.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.